Hawaii statutes.
§373C-32 Organization. The delivery of
career information on a statewide basis shall be through the Hawaii career
information delivery system program, operated and managed by the department of
labor and industrial relations to provide for the maximum input of customer
needs and concerns practicable. [L 1983, c 193, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 171, §6]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next